Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-325
Engineer's report; notice of hearing; record; contents; filing.

A copy of the above notice fixing the time and place of such hearing together with a resolution adopting the same shall be spread on the records of the board. The reports of the engineer shall be spread at large on the minutes of the proceedings of the board of supervisors of the drainage district, and the maps and profiles shall be placed on file with the secretary of the board where all persons interested may have access to the same.

Laws 1905, c. 161, § 13, p. 620;

Laws 1909, c. 147, § 4, p. 512;

R.S.1913, § 1820;

C.S.1922, § 1767;

C.S.1929, § 31-424;

R.S.1943, § 31-325.